new_core/conf/ru_RU.dic
читающий/A
четырехконечный/A
четверговый/A
чередующийся/A
щипнувший/A
этимологический/A
энцефалитный/A
электризовавший/A
эксгумировавший/A
шуйский/A
шпаклёванный/AS
широкополый/A
шестидневный/A
шанхайский/A
зубриный/A
змеящийся/A
зеленогорский/A
защипавший/A
зазвеневший/A
завлечённый/AS
завальный/A
затвердивший/A
затормаживавшийся/A
заталкивающий/A
застолбленный/AS
заслоняющийся/A
заржавленный/AS
заявленный/AS
запрессовывавшийся/A
заплаканный/AX
запакованный/AS
замысливший/A
замеривший/A
заливной/A
закручивавшийся/A
закомпостировавший/A
закатываемый/A
захоронивший/A
загрипповавший/A
заглазный/A
задрапировывавший/A
зацепившийся/A
забивавший/A
взъерошенный/AS
взмывавший/A
взбунтовавший/A
вычерпавший/A
вывозивший/A
выуживаемый/A
высчитывавший/A
высовывавший/A
высмеивающийся/A
вырубивший/A
выпрямляющий/A
выпиливаемый/A
вымогавший/A
вылетающий/A
выкликавший/A
выхлёбывающий/A
выдувавшийся/A
выбраковываемый/A
вживляющийся/A
всыпаемый/A
всплескивающий/A
всеправославный/A
вязовый/A
впечатавший/A
вознесенный/AS
воздаваемый/A
воссоединивший/A
восхитительнейший/A
вольнолюбивый/AS
водопроводящий/A
вносимый/A
вмазавший/A
вклинивший/A
винтокрылый/A
вещающийся/A
вермишельный/A
веймарский/A
важничавший/A
вагнеровский/A
жевавший/A
жароупорный/A
ушкуйничающий/A
увлекательнейший/A
ужесточённый/AS
утолительный/A
усваивающий/A
усовершенствованный/ASX
усадебный/A
упросивший/A
упечённый/AS
умягчившийся/A
умаляемый/A
укупоривающий/A
указавший/A
угнетаемый/A
удостаивающий/A
убыстривший/A
твореный/A
туманный/AEX
тройственный/A
трепаный/A
трехгранный/A
трансформационный/A
трёхоконный/A
тотальный/AS
тонкораспыленный/A
ткнувший/A
теснившийся/A
теплообменный/A
технотронный/A
таломёрзлый/A
съедавший/A
святящийся/A
свезённый/AS
сверивший/A
свайный/A
сургучовый/A
судоподъёмный/A
струнный/A
страждущий/A
столбиковый/A
стенографирующий/A
старожильский/A
ссутуливший/A
сразившийся/A
справленный/AS
спиртоводочный/A
спёртый/A
советизированный/AS
сосредотачивавшийся/A
сопричастный/AS
солоделый/A
содрогавшийся/A
снесенный/AS
смольный/A
смачивающий/A
слонообразный/A
сладкогласный/A
скрывавший/A
скороподъемный/A
склеральный/A
скандалящий/A
синелевый/A
схоронивший/A
сфальшививший/A
сеялочный/A
селенистый/A
сдерживавшийся/A
сближающийся/A
санаторный/AZ
самобытный/AES
рыпающийся/A
рукополагающий/A
роторный/A
рисковавший/A
ревизующий/A
ремонтирующий/A
рефрактерный/A
разъезжавшийся/A
развлеченный/AS
разваливающийся/A
разрушающийся/A
разогреваемый/A
размыканный/A
размалеванный/AS
разгримированный/AS
раздражившийся/A
разболтованный/AS
расчистивший/A
растворённый/AS
растерявший/A
расстегивающийся/A
рассекречивающий/A
распроклятый/AS
расплющенный/AS
распадающийся/A
расковырявший/A
раскатившийся/A
расценивающий/A
радиаторный/A
якутский/A
пузатый/AS
психрофильный/A
прочерчивавший/A
провозивший/A
проваливший/A
протопавший/A
противнейший/A
просунувшийся/A
просмотревший/A
прорубавший/A
проплакавший/A
проникшийся/A
промахивающийся/A
проконсультировавшийся/A
производный/AS
проговорившийся/A
продырявливающий/A
продавливающийся/A
пробегающийся/A
пришоссейный/A
привнёсший/A
приучаемый/A
притирающий/A
пристраивавший/A
прислуживающий/A
припомнивший/A
приотворенный/AS
принёсший/A
прилизавшийся/A
приколотивший/A
прихлёстывавший/A
придвигавший/A
приберёгший/A
преуспевающий/A
преподавший/A
преклонившийся/A
предстоящий/A
предопределявшийся/A
правдивейший/A
почтённый/AS
пошаркавший/A
повыпадавший/A
поверяющий/A
потускневший/A
потерший/A
посторонившийся/A
послужной/A
порывшийся/A
поразвлекший/A
поправленный/AS
пообсохший/A
помурлыкавший/A
помахивавший/A
полуразрушенный/AS
полощущийся/A
политональный/A
покусавший/A
покипевший/A
похеривший/A
пофантазировавший/A
подзаборный/A
подваливавший/A
подтасовываемый/A
подставляющийся/A
подрыгивавший/A
подпоясываемый/A
подогревающийся/A
подмерзший/A
подкрутивший/A
подкативший/A
подергивавшийся/A
подбегающий/A
побережённый/AS
плодоягодный/A
платформенный/A
питерский/A
печалившийся/A
персональный/AS
перешивающийся/A
переворачивающийся/A
перевёртывавший/A
перетягивавший/A
переставленный/AS
пересёдлывавший/A
перепотрошённый/AS
переосвидетельствовавший/A
перенаселенный/AS
перематывающий/A
перекуковавший/A
переклёванный/AS
перехлёстывавший/A
передвинутый/AS
перебрасываемый/A
пенитенциарный/A
патентованный/ASX
парный/AZ
пантовый/A
пакгаузный/A
ощутительный/AZ
озеленительный/A
отъезжающий/A
отшлепанный/AS
отвечавший/A
отутюженный/AS
отсчётный/A
отсосный/A
отрубевидный/A
отяжеленный/AS
отпихнутый/AS
отодравшийся/A
отмазавшийся/A
открываемый/A
откланявшийся/A
отгребший/A
отдавивший/A
отавный/A
остывающий/A
оставленный/AS
осложняющий/A
осаждаемый/A
опьянелый/A
опрашивавший/A
оплодотворяемый/A
опалубочный/A
оледенелый/A
окочурившийся/A
оказывавший/A
огрублявший/A
огласивший/A
односпальный/A
оделявший/A
общий/AS
обволакиваемый/A
обуздывавший/A
обстряпавший/A
обряжавший/A
обязанный/AS
обогревший/A
обнюхиваемый/A
облыселый/A
облачающийся/A
обихаживающий/A
обездвиживший/A
обдувающий/A
нравоописательный/A
нонешний/A
ниспроверженный/AS
незапамятный/A
невеликий/AS
нетленный/AX
несингулярный/A
неясный/AS
непочатый/A
неосуществленный/A
ненатуральный/AS
неконституционный/AX
неграмотный/AS
недооценивавшийся/A
небелковый/A
называющий/A
навезший/A
наугольный/A
насыщающийся/A
насобиравший/A
наряжённый/AS
напряденный/AS
напертый/AS
наметывающий/A
налаженный/AS
наклеивающийся/A
нахваставшийся/A
нагнутый/AS
надтесываемый/A
надгробный/A
наблюдённый/AS
мутовчатый/A
мягкошерстный/A
морковкин/A
моллюсковый/A
многоуровневый/A
многоценный/A
милиарный/A
межпрограммный/A
метагалактический/A
мелкоочаговый/A
матрасный/A
маркёрский/A
маловерный/A
малодушествовавший/A
магнетизёрский/A
лязгнувший/A
лоботрясничающий/A
лимонный/AZ
лессированный/AS
легализующий/A
лакунарный/A
квазиодномерный/A
куролесящий/A
кубистский/A
кровоточивший/A
крестоносный/A
красивенький/A
костромской/A
короткометражный/A
кооптировавшийся/A
консольный/A
компостерный/A
колядующий/A
кокаиновый/A
клеймёный/A
кипятившийся/A
кажущийся/A
кардиоревматологический/A
кандалакшский/A
калёвочный/A
извозчицкий/A
изрыгнувший/A
изнуряющий/AZ
изливший/A
ивняковый/A
истолкованный/AS
исполнительский/A
искомый/A
инжектировавший/A
иногородний/A
импотентный/A
игловатый/A
хрумкающий/A
холстинный/A
хлопкопрядильный/A
хаотический/AZ
губительный/AES
громивший/A
грамотрицательный/A
горнорабочий/A
голодающий/A
глотающий/A
гиперболизированный/A
герметизирующий/A
газоотводный/A
галлюцинаторный/AZ
фрезерный/A
форматируемый/A
финансирующий/A
фаунистический/A
евангельский/A
дымивший/A
двухсаженный/A
двигателестроительный/A
дудевший/A
дрейфовый/A
довооружавшийся/A
дотерпевший/A
доскональный/AS
доплётшийся/A
должностной/A
доклассовый/A
доедавший/A
длинношерстый/A
дискредитировавший/A
диафрагмировавший/A
десятитомный/A
демпферный/A
деградирующий/A
дакроновый/A
цепочный/A
цапавшийся/A
буянящий/A
брусующий/A
бредивший/A
борный/A
богомоловые/A
блаженненький/A
биполярный/A
безвкуснейший/A
безмолвствовавший/A
бестоварный/A
беспечный/AES
бемольный/A
базировавший/A
бальзамовый/A
бацнувший/A
автодинный/A
астигматический/A
архивированный/AS
антропоморфический/A
антагонистичный/A
анабиотический/A
алкогольный/A
акцепторный/A
адмиралтейский/A
юродствующий/A
